en: Apple compotes, Apple compote
bg: Компот от ябълки
ca: Compotes de poma, compota de poma
da: Æblekompot
de: Apfelkompott
es: Compotas de manzana, Purés de manzana, Compota de manzana
fi: omenakompotit
fr: Compotes de pomme, Compotes de pommes, Compote de pommes
he: לפתן תפוחים, קומפוט תפוחים
hr: Kompoti od jabuka
hu: Almakompótok
it: Composte di mela
lt: Tyrės su obuoliais
nl: Appelcompotes, Applemoezen, Appelmoes
pt: Compotas de maçã
sv: Äppelmos
zh: 苹果果泥

en: Banana pulp
fr: Pulpe de banane
nl: Bananenpulp

en: Peach compotes
bg: Компот от праскови
de: Pfirsichkompott
fr: Compotes de pêche, Compotes de peche
hr: Kompoti od breskvi
it: Composte di pesca
lt: Persikų tyrės, Tyrės su persikais

en: Apricot compotes
bg: Компот от кайсии
de: Aprikosenkompott
fr: Compotes d'abricot
hr: Kompoti od marelica
it: Composte di albicocca
lt: Abrikosų tyrės, Tyrės su abrikosais

en: Mango compotes
de: Mangokompott
es: Compotas de mango
fr: Compotes de mangues, Compotes mangues
hr: Kompoti od manga
it: Composte di mango
lt: Mangų tyrės, Tyrės su mangais
nl: Mangocompotes

en: Prune purees
fr: Purées de pruneaux

en: Rhubarb compotes
de: Rhabarberkompott
fr: Compotes de rhubarbe
hr: Kompoti od rabarbare
it: Composte di rabarbaro
lt: Rabarbarų tyrės, Tyrės su rabarbarais
nl: Rabarbercompotes, Rabarbercompote

en: Pear compotes, Pear compote
bg: Компот от круши
de: Birnenkompott
fr: Compotes de poire, Compotes de poires
hr: Kompoti od krušaka
it: Composte di pera
lt: Kriaušių tyrės, Tyrės su kriaušėmis

en: Quince compotes
fr: Compotes de coings

en: Pure apple compotes
nl: Pure appelcompotes

en: Apricot Apple compotes
de: Apfel-Aprikosen-Kompott, Aprikosen-Apfel-Kompott
fr: Compotes pommes abricot
hr: Kompoti od marelica i jabuka
it: Composte mela e albicocca
lt: Obuolių ir abrikosų tyrės, Tyrės su obuoliais ir abrikosais
nl: Appel-abrikozencompotes, Abrikozen-appelcompotes

en: Banana Apple compotes
de: Apfel-Bananen-Kompott, Bananen-Apfel-Kompott
fr: Compotes pommes banane
hr: Kompoti od banane i jabuke
it: Composte mela e banana
lt: Obuolių ir bananų tyrės, Tyrės su obuoliais ir bananais
nl: Appel-banaancompotes, Banaan-appelcompotes

fr: Compotes pommes cassis
de: Apfel-Johannisbeer-Kompott, Johannisbeer-Apfel-Kompott
it: Composte mela e ribes nero
lt: Juodųjų serbentų ir obuolių tyrės, Tyrės su obuoliais ir juodaisiais serbentais
nl: Appel-cassiscompotes, Cassis-appelcompotes

en: Chestnut applesauces
de: Apfel-Kastanien-Kompott, Kastanien-Apfel-Kompott
fr: Compotes pommes châtaigne
hr: Umaci od jabuka od kestena
it: Composte mela e castagna
lt: Kaštonų ir obuolių tyrė
nl: Appel-kastanjecompotes, Kastanje-appelcompotes

fr: Compotes pommes coing
de: Apfel-Quitten-Kompott, Quitten-Apfel-Kompott
it: Composte mela e cotogna
lt: Svarainių ir obuolių tyrės, Tyrės su obuoliais ir svarainiais
nl: Appel-kweepeercompotes, Kweepeer-appelcompotes

en: Strawberry applesauces
de: Erdbeer-Apfelmus, Erdbeer-Apfel-Saucen
fr: Compotes pommes fraise
hr: Umaci od jabuka od jagoda
it: Composte mela e fragola
lt: Braškių ir obuolių tyrė
nl: Aardbeien-appelcompotes, Appel-aardbeiencompotes

en: Raspberry applesauces
de: Himbeer-Apfelmus, Himbeer-Apfel-Purée
fr: Compotes pommes framboise
hr: Umaci od jabuka od malina
it: Composte mela e lampone
lt: Aviečių ir obuolių tyrė
nl: Frambozen-appelcompotes, Appel-frambozencompotes, Appel/frambozen compotes

en: Mango applesauces
de: Mango-Apfel-Soßen
fi: mango-omenasoseet
fr: Compotes pommes mangue
hr: Mango jabuke
it: Composte mela e mango
lt: Mangų ir obuolių tyrė
nl: Appel/Mango compotes

fr: Compotes pommes mûre
es: Compotas de manzana y mora
it: Composte mela e mora
lt: Obuolių ir mėlynės tyrės
nl: Appel-bramencompotes

en: Blueberry applesauces
de: Blaubeersauce
fr: Compotes pommes myrtille
hr: Jabuke od borovnice
it: Composte mela e mirtillo
lt: Mėlynių ir obuolių tyrė
nl: Blauwe bessen appelcompotes